Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Land  Conservation and Development shall receive,
consolidate and organize  the public records of federal, state or local government, special
government bodies or other public  bodies related to shellfish mariculture in this state. The
department shall establish an electronic system to  store and share the public record infor-
mation. The public records that  the department collects under this section shall include, but
are not limited to, records related to:
(a) Estuary management plans;
(b) Estuarine habitat technical information;
(c) Native shellfish beds;
(d) Commercial plats;
(e) Fish and wildlife use;
(f) Ongoing recreational and commercial use;
(g) Ownership information regarding tidelands;
(h) Encumbrances on state-owned tidelands; and
(i) Land use plans and  zoning for estuaries that have potential for aquaculture operations
and for other estuaries.
(2) The department  shall organize data and other material contained in the public records
stored by the electronic system into formats suitable for  access by governments, industry
groups, public interest groups and other stakeholders.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection,  the department shall make output from the
electronic system publicly  accessible. If information received into the system is exempt
under ORS 192.355  or conditionally exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.345, the depart-
ment shall  make access to the information conditional upon receipt of permission from the
public body that originally generated the public record.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000, which may be  expended for the
establishment and administration of the program required by section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 622.210 to
622.360.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. (1) A prospective applicant for the cultivation of oysters, clams or mussels
shall, no later than 30 days prior to filing an  application under ORS 622.250, participate in a
preapplication conference with the State Department of Agriculture and other  appropriate
local, state and federal agencies.
(2) Not less than 14 days before the preapplication  conference, the prospective applicant
must provide the  department with adequate information to prepare for the preapplication
conference.
(3) At the preapplication conference,  the department and other appropriate local, state
and federal agencies shall:
(a) Inform the prospective applicant of statutes,  administrative rules, local ordinances
and any other requirements that may apply to the application;
(b) Based on the information  provided by the prospective applicant and other annual
production data and information available to the department, discuss with the prospective
applicant projected revenue data and related matters; and
(c) Assist the prospective applicant by identifying  known issues that may affect the
likelihood that the prospective applicant will be able to meet any  conditions placed on re-
quired permits from state agencies and local governments.
(4) The prospective applicant  may request additional preapplication consultation with the
department.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000, which may  be expended for work related to
conducting preapplication conferences under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall establish and administer
a program for community outreach and education to  provide residents of this state with
guidance and instruction regarding opportunities for the recreational harvesting of shellfish.
The department shall make information readily  available to schools and members of the
public through:
(a) Internet or other electronic means;
(b) Regulatory signs;
(c) Brochures, maps and other printed material;
(d) Workshops and clinics; and
(e) Special outreach events.
(2) In carrying out the program described in subsection  (1) of this section, the depart-
ment shall cooperate with  Indian tribes and the Department of State Police in efforts to
enhance the enforcement of commercial and recreational shellfish catch limits.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $160,000, which may be expended for the adminis-
tration and enforcement of the program required by section 6 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2574 (HB 2574-A) Page 3